New York, session 2025-2026, A6760.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. The legislature finds that feasibil- 2 ity issues related to the pace of technological advances, the capacity 3 of the state's power grid, and the impacts of weather and other route 4 conditions on zero-emission school buses (ZEBs) operated throughout the 5 state present significant challenges to school districts working to 6 transition their fleets in accordance with the department of education's 7 (SED) first transition deadline of July 1, 2027. For that reason, this 8 legislation addresses two separate concerns with current law. First, it 9 examines the feasibility of each district's transition process. Second, 10 for those districts deemed to have the most feasible paths to transi- 11 tion, the legislation directs SED, in conjunction with the New York 12 state energy research and development authority (NYSERDA) and the 13 department of health (DOH), to assess a defined group of district char- 14 acteristics to determine which districts shall receive prioritized 15 transportation and building aid for the purchase of additional trans- 16 mission capacity and/or ZEBs and the design and construction of related 17 infrastructure. 18 With respect to an individual district's ability to comply with the 19 existing mandate, the legislation directs SED to require all school EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09808-08-5 A. 6760--B 2 1 districts to complete a baseline transition feasibility analysis and to 2 repeat that process every five years. If a district's analysis deter- 3 mines that more than 50% of the district's regular bus routes are not 4 deemed feasible for service by zero-emission school buses, then the 5 district may maintain its existing fleet status quo until its next tran- 6 sition feasibility analysis. On the other hand, if a district's analy- 7 sis determines that more than 50% of the district's regular bus routes 8 are serviceable by zero-emission buses, then the district must comply 9 with the existing transition timeline for the percentage of regular 10 routes deemed feasible and may maintain the status quo for the 11 district's remaining non-feasible regular routes until the district 12 completes its next transition feasibility analysis. The outer deadline 13 for districts with substantial feasibility challenges to transition 14 their fleets will be 2040. 15 Despite the multi-faceted transition challenges faced by some 16 districts, e.g., average low temperatures, topography and route distance 17 vary widely across the state and substantially impact manufacturer's 18 specifications and ZEB reliability, voters tend to focus exclusively on 19 the variable of cost. Unfortunately, while there have been steady price 20 declines in consumer electric vehicles since the transition deadlines 21 were set in 2022, ZEBs still cost two to four times more than tradi- 22 tional internal combustion engine (ICE) buses, and the average cost of a 23 ZEB has increased by 8.7%. In addition, three years ago experts forecast 24 parity between the total cost of ownership for ZEBs and ICEs to occur by 25 2027, but now the forecast has extended to 2030 or beyond. Because the 26 high cost for adding transmission and charging infrastructure to accom- 27 modate ZEBs falls predominantly on individual school districts, public 28 support for the transition frequently wanes when voters must choose 29 between spending limited budget dollars on educational expenses or for 30 reducing local tailpipe emissions. There is no real debate for many 31 voters in such a scenario, particularly for rural school districts that 32 have low pupil populations and lots of fresh air, but few resources and 33 high educational needs. 34 To promote a more effective transition with a greater impact sooner, 35 the legislature finds that the state must initially concentrate the 36 funding allocated to the transition on school districts with more than 37 two thousand pupils. Within such group of school districts, the state 38 shall then assess which districts, based on their county's childhood 39 asthma ER visit rate, their transition feasibility analysis, SED's 40 need/resource capacity index rating and per pupil spending, shall be 41 prioritized to receive transportation and building aid relief for the 42 purchase of additional transmission capacity and/or ZEBs and the design 43 and construction of related infrastructure. Data indicates that, to 44 date, only thirty-one of New York state's seven hundred thirty-one 45 school districts have sought voter approval to purchase ZEBs. Voters in 46 eight of the thirty-one districts voted "no". 47 Upon review of all thirty-one school districts which voted, certain 48 patterns have emerged: 49 1. Districts with fewer than 2000 pupils voted "no" to ZEBs more 50 frequently. Of the eight school districts which voted "no" to ZEBs, six 51 have fewer than 2000 pupils and five of those six districts are rural 52 districts. 53 2. Rural districts with a "high" need/resource capacity index voted 54 "no" more frequently. Of the five rural school districts that voted 55 "no", SED categorizes four of those districts as "high" on its A. 6760--B 3 1 need/resource capacity index, with the fifth district categorized as 2 "average". 3 3. DOH does not quantify childhood asthma ER visit rates as "high" 4 concern in the counties of most rural districts. Four of the five rural 5 school districts which voted "no" to ZEBs (with the exception of 6 Edwards-Knox Central School District in St. Lawrence County) are located 7 in counties of "low" concern for childhood asthma ER visit rates. (Per 8 DOH, St. Lawrence County is of "moderate" concern.) Of the six school 9 districts with less than 2000 pupils that voted "no", Mexico Central 10 School - located east of SUNY Oswego along Lake Ontario - was the only 11 suburban school district, however, it is located in a county with "low" 12 concern for childhood asthma ER visit rates. 13 Further patterns emerge when one contrasts the "no" votes with the 14 "yes" votes. 15 4. Districts with 2000 or more pupils voted "yes" to ZEBs more 16 frequently. Fourteen of the sixteen school districts with 2000 or more 17 pupils voted "yes" to ZEBs. In contrast, only nine of the fifteen school 18 districts with less than 2000 pupils voted "yes". When examining the two 19 districts with 2000 or more pupils which voted "no" - Churchville-Chili 20 Central School District, a suburban district southwest of the City of 21 Rochester, and Baldwinsville Central School District, a suburban 22 district northwest of the city of Syracuse - the votes initially appear 23 to be outliers, as each district has large pupil populations (of 3,688 24 and 5,444, respectively) and is located in a county with "moderate" to 25 "high" concern for childhood asthma ER visit rates. However, as noted 26 below, another characteristic of each of those two districts undoubtedly 27 plays a pivotal role in their voting results. 28 5. Districts with an "average" need/resource capacity index rating and 29 per pupil spending below $19,500 voted "no" to ZEBs. Each of the four- 30 teen districts with more than 2000 pupils which voted "yes" to ZEBs have 31 "low" or "average" need/resource capacity index ratings and spend more 32 than $19,500 per pupil. In contrast, the two large districts which voted 33 "no" - Churchville-Chili and Baldwinsville - each with "average" 34 need/resource capacity index ratings and high childhood asthma ER visit 35 rates, both spend less than $19,500 per pupil. Moreover, unlike small 36 districts which voted "yes" but which have "average" need/resource 37 capacity index ratings with per pupil spending exceeding $19,500, Bemus 38 Point central school district, a small district with an "average" 39 need/resource capacity index rating and less than $19,500 per pupil 40 spending, voted "no" to ZEBs. 41 While most school district administrators support the transition to 42 ZEBs, the practical mechanics of the transition are challenging and 43 costly. Administrators and voters alike feel the limitations of their 44 local school district budgets, and as demonstrated by ZEB votes across 45 the state, when put "between a rock and a hard place", voters will 46 consistently prioritize educational spending over transportation spend- 47 ing, even when the community's asthma health risks are high. Large 48 districts with low per pupil spending need financial assistance to help 49 them accomplish the transition. The state can achieve the largest 50 advances in public health in the shortest amount of time if it initially 51 prioritizes allocated funds to districts with 2000 or more pupils, no 52 more than an "average" need/resource capacity index rating, and per 53 pupil spending of less than $19,500. As a result of such policy priori- 54 ties, large districts with demonstrated feasibility challenges and small 55 districts with less than 2000 pupils will be given additional time to A. 6760--B 4 1 complete their transitions in accordance with their current transition 2 feasibility analysis. 3 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 3638 of the education law, as added by 4 section 1 of subpart A of part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 1. For the purposes of this section "zero-emission school bus" shall 7 mean a school bus that: is propelled by an electric motor and associated 8 power electronics which provide acceleration torque to the drive wheels 9 during normal vehicle operations and draws electricity from a hydrogen 10 fuel cell or battery; or otherwise operates without direct emission of 11 atmospheric pollutants, provided however that, notwithstanding the fore- 12 going, for the purposes of this section such term shall include a hybrid 13 battery electric bus with a second source of energy for propulsion. 14 § 3. Section 3638 of the education law is amended by adding two new 15 subdivisions 1-a and 1-b to read as follows: 16 1-a. The department shall require every school district to complete a 17 transition feasibility analysis before the end of the next succeeding 18 full school year, or within fifteen months, as of the effective date of 19 this subdivision, whichever is sooner, and every five years thereafter, 20 to determine which if any regular routes can feasibly be serviced by 21 zero-emission school buses, provided that existing feasibility studies 22 completed within the two years preceding the adoption of this subdivi- 23 sion shall meet the requirements of this subdivision. The analysis shall 24 assess each district's transportation needs, current bus routes and 25 alternative routes based on distance, topography, bridge and road 26 infrastructure, average low temperatures, and a minimum end-of-route 27 charge requirement of no less than twenty percent, consider the suffi- 28 ciency of the school district's electric transmission capacity and 29 infrastructure and assess the availability of and accessibility to state 30 and/or federal funding for the purchase of zero-emission school buses 31 and construction of associated infrastructure. For purposes of categor- 32 izing schools pursuant to this section, the pupil population of a school 33 district shall be the number most recently reported to the department or 34 the number used in the district's current transition feasibility analy- 35 sis, whichever is lower, and such number shall be deemed to remain 36 unchanged until updated in the school district's next succeeding transi- 37 tion feasibility analysis. 38 1-b. Within six months of the effective date of this subdivision and 39 annually thereafter, the department, in consultation with the New York 40 state energy research and development authority and department of 41 health, shall develop a list of school districts with two thousand or 42 more pupils and rank their need for transportation and building aid for 43 the purchase of zero-emission buses and transmission capacity and the 44 design and construction of related infrastructure based on an assessment 45 of each such district's current transition feasibility analysis, average 46 per pupil spending, the most recent department of health data regarding 47 the rate of emergency room visits for asthma per ten thousand persons 48 aged zero to seventeen in the county in which such school district is 49 located, and the needs/resource capacity group to which the commissioner 50 has assigned such school district. To maximize the effectiveness of the 51 state's limited pool of aid funding for the transition to zero-emission 52 school buses, the commissioner shall prioritize the award of such allo- 53 cated transportation and building aid to the high need school districts 54 whose transition will likely have the highest positive health impact on 55 the highest number of students. A. 6760--B 5 1 § 4. Subdivision 2 of section 3638 of the education law, as added by 2 section 1 of subpart A of part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 2. (a) [No later than July first, two thousand twenty-seven, every] 5 Every school district with two thousand or more pupils shall, by no 6 later than July first, two thousand thirty, abide by the findings of the 7 district's current transition feasibility analysis, completed in accord- 8 ance with subdivision one-a of this section, as set forth in this subdi- 9 vision. If the findings of a school district's transition feasibility 10 analysis indicate that: 11 (i) [only purchase or lease zero-emission school buses when purchasing 12 or leasing new buses; 13 (ii) include requirements in any procurement for school transportation 14 services that any contractors providing transportation services for the 15 school district must only purchase or lease zero-emission school buses 16 when purchasing or leasing new school buses; and 17 (iii)] fifty percent or more of all regular routes are not deemed 18 feasible for service by zero-emission school buses, then the school 19 district may continue to operate, maintain or contract for non-zero-em- 20 ission school buses and receive transportation aid for non-zero-emission 21 school buses purchased or leased to make required transportation runs; 22 or 23 (ii) less than fifty percent of all regular routes are not deemed 24 feasible for service by zero-emission school buses, then the school 25 district (A) shall operate, maintain or contract for zero-emission 26 school buses and receive transportation aid for zero-emission school 27 buses purchased or leased for such regular routes as are deemed feasibly 28 serviceable by a zero-emission school bus or for an equivalent percent- 29 age of regular routes deemed feasible for service by such buses and (B) 30 may operate, maintain or contract for non-zero-emission school buses for 31 the remaining regular routes and receive transportation aid for non- 32 zero-emission school buses purchased or leased to make required trans- 33 portation runs for such remaining regular routes. 34 (a-1) With respect to any zero-emission school buses operated or main- 35 tained by a school district in accordance with the findings of the 36 district's current transition feasibility analysis as set forth in para- 37 graph (a) of this subdivision, such school district shall include 38 requirements in any procurement for the manufacturing or retrofitting of 39 a zero-emission school bus and charging or fueling infrastructure that 40 the components and parts used or supplied in the performance of the 41 contract or any subcontract thereto shall be produced or made in whole 42 or substantial part in the United States, its territories or possessions 43 and that final assembly of the zero-emission school bus and charging or 44 fueling infrastructure shall occur in the United States, its territories 45 or possessions. 46 (a-2) Every school district with less than two thousand pupils shall, 47 by no later than July first, two thousand thirty-seven: 48 (i) only purchase or lease zero-emission school buses when purchasing 49 or leasing new buses; 50 (ii) include requirements in any procurement for school transportation 51 services that any contractors providing transportation services for the 52 school district must only purchase or lease zero-emission school buses 53 when purchasing or leasing new school buses; and 54 (iii) include requirements in any procurement for the manufacturing or 55 retrofitting of a zero-emission school bus and charging or fueling 56 infrastructure that the components and parts used or supplied in the A. 6760--B 6 1 performance of the contract or any subcontract thereto shall be produced 2 or made in whole or substantial part in the United States, its territo- 3 ries or possessions and that final assembly of the zero-emission school 4 bus and charging or fueling infrastructure shall occur in the United 5 States, its territories or possessions. 6 (b) The commissioner, in consultation with the New York state energy 7 research and development authority and office of general services, may 8 waive the contracting requirements set forth in [subparagraph (iii) of] 9 paragraph [(a)] (a-1) of this subdivision if the commissioner determines 10 that the requirements would not be in the public interest, would result 11 in unreasonable costs, or that obtaining such zero-emission school buses 12 and charging or fueling infrastructure components and parts in the 13 United States would increase the cost of a school district's contract 14 for zero-emission school buses and charging or fueling infrastructure by 15 an unreasonable amount, or such zero-emission school busses and charging 16 or fueling infrastructure components and parts cannot be produced, made, 17 or assembled in the United States in sufficient and reasonably available 18 quantities or of satisfactory quality. Such determination must be made 19 on an annual basis no later than December thirty-first, after providing 20 notice and an opportunity for public comment, and be made publicly 21 available, in writing, on the department's website with a detailed 22 explanation of the findings leading to such determination. If the 23 commissioner has issued determinations for three consecutive years that 24 no such waiver is warranted pursuant to this paragraph, then the commis- 25 sioner shall no longer be required to provide the annual determinations 26 required by this paragraph. 27 (c) Any school district which encumbers funds and places an order for 28 a zero-emission school bus prior to July first, two thousand thirty, but 29 which does not receive delivery of such bus before such date, shall be 30 deemed in compliance with the provisions of this subdivision. 31 (d) For the purpose of this subdivision, "regular routes" are defined 32 as daily runs to and from a student's home, child care or bus stop to 33 the district school. Routes to transport students off the primary 34 school campus for boards of cooperative educational services (BOCES) 35 programs, special education placements at a distance greater than thirty 36 miles from the district school and to transport homeless students and 37 students to and from extracurricular activities shall be deemed "non 38 regular" routes and exempted from any zero-emission school bus require- 39 ment pursuant to this chapter. 40 § 5. Subdivision 3 of section 3638 of the education law, as added by 41 section 1 of subpart A of part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is 42 amended to read as follows: 43 3. [No later than July first, two thousand thirty-five, every] (a) 44 Every school district with two thousand or more pupils shall, by no 45 later than July first, two thousand thirty-seven: 46 [(a)] (i) only operate and maintain zero-emission school buses; and 47 [(b)] (ii) include requirements in any procurement for school trans- 48 portation services that any contractors providing transportation 49 services for the school district must only operate zero-emission school 50 buses when providing such transportation services to the school 51 district. 52 (b) Every school district with less than two thousand pupils shall, by 53 no later than July first, two thousand forty: 54 (i) only operate and maintain zero-emission school buses; and 55 (ii) include requirements in any procurement for school transportation 56 services that any contractors providing transportation services for the A. 6760--B 7 1 school district must only operate zero-emission school buses when 2 providing such transportation services to the school district. 3 § 6. Subdivision 4 of section 3638 of the education law, as added by 4 section 1 of subpart A of part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 4. A school district may apply to the commissioner, and the department 7 may grant a one-time extension of up to twenty-four months to comply 8 with the requirements of subdivision [two] three of this section. The 9 commissioner shall consider a school district's effort to meet the 10 requirements of subdivision [two] three of this section when granting an 11 extension, including but not limited to, procurement efforts made by the 12 school district, applications for state or federal funds, changes needed 13 to school district operations to meet the requirements of this section, 14 employee training, and receipt of technical assistance, if any. Upon a 15 school district receiving an extension, the New York state energy 16 research and development authority, in consultation with the department, 17 shall provide any additional technical assistance necessary to the 18 district to meet the requirements of subdivision [two] three of this 19 section. 20 § 7. Subdivision 1 of section 3623-a of the education law is amended 21 by adding a new paragraph a-1 to read as follows: 22 a-1. Zero-emission bus transition feasibility analysis, conducted 23 pursuant to subdivision one-a of section thirty-six hundred thirty-eight 24 of this article; 25 § 8. Paragraph e of subdivision 1 of section 3623-a of the education 26 law is amended by adding two new subparagraphs 1-a and 7-a to read as 27 follows: 28 (1-a) salary for a zero-emission transportation transition planner; 29 (7-a) costs incurred to transport an out-of-service zero-emission bus 30 for storage and repairs; 31 § 9. Subdivision 3 of section 35 of part A of chapter 56 of the laws 32 of 2023 amending the education law relating to contracts for excellence, 33 is amended to read as follows: 34 3. Section nineteen of this act shall expire and be deemed repealed 35 June 30, [2036] 2041; and 36 § 10. This act shall take effect immediately.